New York, session 2025-2026, S8910.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 114-f to read as follows: 3 § 114-f. Electric skateboard. Every device weighing less than one 4 hundred pounds that: 5 (a) may have handlebars, a floorboard designed to be stood upon by the 6 operator that is no more than sixty inches long and eighteen inches 7 wide, and an electric motor; 8 (b) can be powered by an electric motor and/or human power; 9 (c) is designed to transport only one person at a time; and 10 (d) has a maximum speed of no more than twenty-five miles per hour on 11 a paved level surface when powered solely by the electric motor. 12 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 13 1809-f to read as follows: 14 § 1809-f. Increased penalties for reckless operation and unauthorized 15 modification of electric personal mobility devices. 1. For purposes of 16 this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 17 (a) "Electric personal mobility device" shall mean an electric bicycle 18 with assist as defined in section one hundred two-c of this chapter, an 19 electric scooter as defined in section one hundred fourteen-e of this 20 chapter, a hoverboard, or an electric skateboard as defined in section 21 one hundred fourteen-f of this chapter. 22 (b) "Reckless operation" shall mean driving on sidewalks in a manner 23 that endangers pedestrians, ignoring traffic control devices such as 24 stop signs and traffic lights, operating against the flow of traffic, 25 and traveling at excessive speeds in pedestrian-heavy or school zones. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14404-01-6 S. 8910 2 1 (c) "Illegally modified" shall mean the modification of an electric 2 personal mobility device to exceed manufacturer set speed limits or 3 bypass safety regulations. 4 2. If an individual is found to have engaged in reckless operation of 5 an electric personal mobility device, a first offense shall result in a 6 fine of up to two hundred fifty dollars and the completion of a safety 7 education course by the offender. A second offense committed within two 8 years from the first offense shall result in a fine of up to five 9 hundred dollars and may also result in temporary confiscation of the 10 electric personal mobility device used for a period of up to thirty 11 days. A third and subsequent offenses shall result in a fine of up to 12 one thousand dollars, permanent confiscation of the electric personal 13 mobility device used and potential misdemeanor charges if injury or 14 property damage results from such reckless operation. 15 3. Any individual who has been found to have illegally modified an 16 electric personal mobility device shall be subject to a fine of up to 17 seven hundred fifty dollars, immediate confiscation of such electric 18 personal mobility device, and civil liability for any resulting harm. An 19 individual may retrieve a confiscated device only after all fines are 20 paid, any civil liability is resolved, and the individual provides writ- 21 ten documentation from a certified mechanic confirming that the device 22 is scheduled for repair on a specific date and that the illegal modifi- 23 cations will be removed. If the individual fails to complete the 24 required modifications on the date specified, they shall be subject to 25 an additional fine of up to one thousand dollars, permanent confiscation 26 of the electric personal mobility device, and a charge of reckless 27 endangerment in the second degree, classified as a class A misdemeanor. 28 4. Local law enforcement and traffic officers shall be authorized to 29 issue citations and confiscate devices as necessary in accordance with 30 the provisions of this section. 31 5. The department of transportation shall develop and distribute 32 public education materials on the safe and lawful operation of electric 33 personal mobility devices. Such materials shall include, but not be 34 limited to, clear explanations of applicable traffic laws and local 35 ordinances, guidance on where and how such devices may be legally oper- 36 ated, such as bike lanes vs. sidewalks, information on speed limits, 37 helmet use, and age restrictions, warnings about the dangers and legal 38 consequences of reckless operation or illegal modifications, and 39 instructions for reporting unsafe behavior or malfunctioning devices. 40 Materials shall be made available in multiple formats, including print, 41 digital, and on social media, and shall be distributed through schools, 42 community centers, and retail outlets that sell or rent electric mobili- 43 ty devices in the state of New York. The department of transportation 44 shall also collaborate with local governments and law enforcement to 45 ensure consistent messaging and community outreach. 46 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 47 have become a law.